Connecticut, session 2026, SB00428.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) There is established an
Academic Research Funding Commission, which shall be part of the
Executive Department.
(b) The commission shall consist of the following members:
(1) One appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
who is a member of the faculty at The University of Connecticut;
(2) One appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, who is
a member of the faculty at a state university within the Connecticut State
University System;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives, who is a member of the faculty at a nonprofit,
independent institution of higher education in the state;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate, who is a
member of the faculty at The University of Connecticut;
(5) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, who is a member of the faculty at a nonprofit,
LCO 1 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 428
independent institution of higher education in the state;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, who is a
member of the faculty at a state university within the Connecticut State
University System;
(7) Two persons appointed by the Governor, who represent large
industry sectors in the state and have experience with research and
technology development;
(8) One appointed by the House chairperson of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to higher education and employment advancement, who is a
member of the faculty at The University of Connecticut School of
Medicine or School of Dental Medicine;
(9) One person appointed by the Senate chairperson of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to higher education and employment advancement,
who is a member of the faculty at The University of Connecticut School
of Medicine or School of Dental Medicine;
(10) One person appointed by the House ranking member of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to higher education and employment advancement,
who is a member of the faculty at a nonprofit, independent institution
of higher education in the state;
(11) One person appointed by the Senate ranking member of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to higher education and employment advancement,
who is a member of the faculty at a nonprofit, independent institution
of higher education in the state;
(12) The vice president of research at The University of Connecticut;
and
(13) The vice president of research at Yale University.
LCO 2 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 428
(c) All initial appointments to the commission pursuant to
subdivisions (1) to (11), inclusive, of subsection (b) of this section shall
be made not later than September 1, 2026, and shall terminate on June
30, 2028, and June 30, 2029, in accordance with the provisions of
subsection (f) of this section, regardless of when the initial appointment
was made. Any member of the commission may serve more than one
term.
(d) The vice presidents of research at The University of Connecticut
and Yale University shall serve as the cochairpersons of the commission.
Such cochairpersons shall schedule the first meeting of the commission,
which shall be held not later than September 1, 2026.
(e) The administrative staff of the Office of Higher Education shall
serve as administrative staff of the commission.
(f) Appointed members of the commission shall serve for two-year
terms which shall commence on the date of appointment, except as
provided in subsection (c) of this section, and members first appointed
shall have the following terms: (1) Members appointed by the Governor,
the majority leader of the House of Representatives, the minority leader
of the House of Representatives and the chairpersons of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to higher education and employment advancement
shall initially serve a term of two years, and (2) members appointed by
the speaker of the House of Representatives, the president pro tempore
of the Senate, the majority leader of the Senate, the minority leader of
the Senate and the ranking members of the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to higher
education and employment advancement shall initially serve a term of
three years. Members shall continue to serve until their successors are
appointed.
(g) Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority. Any
vacancy occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled for the
balance of the unexpired term.
LCO 3 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 428
(h) A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of any business.
(i) The members of the commission shall serve without
compensation, but shall, within the limits of available funds, be
reimbursed for expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of
their duties.
(j) The commission shall have the following powers and duties: (1)
Award research funding grants to research faculty at institutions of
higher education in the state, prioritizing grants to fund research
conducted on topics and subjects that have been reduced, restricted or
eliminated as a result of changes in the funding of grants from the
National Institutes of Health, National Science Foundation and other
federal agencies; (2) obtain from any executive department, board,
commission or other agency of the state such assistance and data as
necessary and available to carry out the purposes of this section; (3)
accept any gift, donation or bequest for the purpose of performing the
duties described in this section; (4) establish bylaws to govern its
procedures; and (5) perform such other acts as may be necessary and
appropriate to carry out the duties described in this section.
(k) The commission shall meet as often as deemed necessary by the
cochairpersons of the commission. Any appointed member who fails to
100 attend three consecutive meetings or who fails to attend fifty per cent of
101 all meetings held during any calendar year shall be deemed to have
102 resigned from the commission.
103 (l) Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
104 commission shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of
105 section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the Governor, the Commissioner
106 of Higher Education and the joint standing committee of the General
107 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to higher education
108 and employment advancement on the research funding grants awarded
109 by the commission during the prior fiscal year, which shall include, but
110 need not be limited to, (1) the number and amount of research funding
LCO 4 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 428
111 grants awarded, (2) the types of research for which the commission
112 awarded research funding grants, (3) the number of applications the
113 commission received from research faculty for research funding grants,
114 and (4) recommendations for policy changes and amendments to the
115 general statutes necessary to expand the impact of research funding
116 grants on the scope of academic research conducted in the state and on
117 the state economy.
118 Sec. 2. (Effective July 1, 2026) The sum of fifty million dollars is
119 appropriated to the Academic Research Funding Commission from the
120 General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to distribute
121 research fund grants to research faculty at institutions of higher
122 education in the state pursuant to section 1 of this act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(f), "and members appointed by" was deleted and references
to appointments made by the chairpersons and ranking members of the
joint standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to higher education and employment advancement
were moved to earlier in the sentence, for consistency.
HED Joint Favorable Subst.-LCO C/R APP
LCO 5 of 5